Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 9
Special Provisions Relating to Distribution

§ 15-3-901. Successors’ rights if no administration.

In the absence of administration, the heirs and devisees are entitled to the estate in accordance with the terms of a probated will or the laws of intestate succession. Devisees may establish title by the probated will to devised property. Persons entitled to property by homestead allowance, exemption or intestacy may establish title thereto by proof of the decedent’s ownership, his death, and their relationship to the decedent. Successors take subject to all charges incident to administration, including the claims of creditors and allowances of surviving spouse and dependent children, and subject to the rights of others resulting from abatement, retainer, advancement, and ademption.

§ 15-3-902. Distribution — Order in which assets appropriated — Abatement.

Except as provided in subsection (b) and except as provided in connection with the share of the surviving spouse who elects to take an elective share, shares of distributees abate, without any preference or priority as between real and personal property, in the following order: (1) property not disposed of by the will; (2) residuary devises; (3) general devises; (4) specific devises. For purposes of abatement, a general devise charged on any specific property or fund is a specific devise to the extent of the value of the property on which it is charged, and upon the failure or insufficiency of the property on which it is charged, a general devise to the extent of the failure or insufficiency. Abatement within each classification is in proportion to the amounts of property each of the beneficiaries would have received if full distribution of the property had been made in accordance with the terms of the will.

If the will expresses an order of abatement, or if the testamentary plan or the express or implied purpose of the devise would be defeated by the order of abatement stated in subsection (a) of this section, the shares of the distributees abate as may be found necessary to give effect to the intention of the testator.

If an estate of a decedent consists partly of separate property and partly of community property, community debts shall be charged to community property and separate debts to separate property. Expenses of administration shall be apportioned and charged against the different kinds of property in proportion to the relative value thereof, except that none of such expenses shall be apportioned or charged to the survivor’s share of the community property.

If the subject of a preferred devise is sold or used incident to administration, abatement shall be achieved by appropriate adjustments in, or contribution from, other interests in the remaining assets.

§ 15-3-903. Right of retainer.

The amount of a non-contingent indebtedness of a successor to the estate if due, or its present value if not due, shall be offset against the successor’s interest; but the successor has the benefit of any defense which would be available to him in a direct proceeding for recovery of the debt.

§ 15-3-904. Interest on general pecuniary devise.

General pecuniary devises bear interest at the legal rate beginning one (1) year after the first appointment of a personal representative until payment, unless a contrary intent is indicated by the will.

§ 15-3-905. Penalty clause for contest.

A provision in a will purporting to penalize any interested person for contesting the will or instituting other proceedings relating to the estate is unenforceable if probable cause exists for instituting proceedings.

§ 15-3-906. Distribution in kind — Valuation — Method.

Unless a contrary intention is indicated by the will, the distributable assets of a decedent’s estate shall be distributed in kind to the extent possible through application of the following provisions:

A specific devisee is entitled to distribution of the thing devised to him, and a spouse or child who has selected particular assets of an estate as provided in section 15-2-403, Idaho Code, shall receive the items selected.

Any homestead or devise payable in money may be satisfied by value in kind provided:

The person entitled to the payment has not demanded payment in cash;

The property distributed in kind is valued at fair market value as of the date of its distribution; and

No residuary devisee has requested that the asset in question remain a part of the residue of the estate.

For the purpose of valuation under paragraph (2), securities regularly traded on recognized exchanges, if distributed in kind, are valued at the price for the last sale of like securities traded on the business day prior to distribution, or if there was no sale on that day, at the median between amounts bid and offered at the close of that day. Assets consisting of sums owed the decedent or the estate by solvent debtors as to which there is no known dispute or defense are valued at the sum due with accrued interest or discounted to the date of distribution. For assets that do not have readily ascertainable values, a valuation as of a date not more than thirty (30) days prior to the date of distribution, if otherwise reasonable, controls. For purposes of facilitating distribution, the personal representative may ascertain the value of the assets as of the time of the proposed distribution in any reasonable way, including the employment of qualified appraisers, even if the assets may have been previously appraised.

The residuary estate shall be distributed in kind if there is no objection to the proposed distribution and it is practicable to distribute undivided interests. In other cases, residuary property may be converted into cash for distribution.

After the probable charges against the estate are known, the personal representative may mail or deliver a proposal for distribution to all persons who have a right to object to the proposed distribution. The right of any distributee to object to the proposed distribution on the basis of the kind or value of asset he is to receive, if not waived earlier in writing, terminates if he fails to object in writing received by the personal representative within thirty (30) days after mailing or delivery of the proposal.

§ 15-3-907. Distribution in kind — Evidence.

If distribution in kind is made, the personal representative shall execute an instrument or deed of distribution assigning, transferring or releasing the assets to the distributee as evidence of the distributee’s title to the property.

§ 15-3-907A. Deceased beneficiary as heir. — (a) If the decedent has left a surviving child or children or issue of children among the persons who are by law entitled to succeed to his estate, and any of them, before the close of administration, has died before reaching the age of eighteen (18) and not having married, no administration of such deceased issue’s estate is necessary, but all the estate which such deceased issue is entitled to receive by inheritance must, without administration, be distributed to the heirs at law of the deceased issue.

(b) If any other heir, legatee, or devisee shall die after the decedent’s death and before distribution, property to which he might be entitled shall be distributed to the representative of his estate or directly to his heirs, legatees or devisees or the persons entitled thereto.

§ 15-3-908. Distribution — Right or title of distributee.

Proof that a distributee has received an instrument or deed of distribution of assets in kind, or payment in distribution, from a personal representative, is conclusive evidence that the distributee has succeeded to the interest of the estate in the distributed assets, as against all persons interested in the estate, except that the personal representative may recover the assets or their value if the distribution was improper.

§ 15-3-909. Improper distribution — Liability of distributee.

Unless the distribution or payment no longer can be questioned because of adjudication, estoppel, or limitation, a distributee of property improperly distributed or paid, or a claimant who was improperly paid, is liable to return the property improperly received and its income since distribution if he has the property. If he does not have the property, then he is liable to return the value as of the date of disposition of the property improperly received and its income and gain received by him.

§ 15-3-910. Purchasers from distributees protected.

If property distributed in kind or a security interest therein is acquired for value by a purchaser from, or lender to, a distributee who has received an instrument or deed of distribution from the personal representative, or is so acquired by a purchaser from or lender to a transferee from such distributee, the purchaser or lender takes title free of rights of any interested person in the estate and incurs no personal liability to the estate, or to any interested person, whether or not the distribution was proper or supported by court order and whether or not the authority of the personal representative was terminated prior to execution of the instrument or deed. This section protects a purchaser from or lender to a distributee who, as personal representative, has executed a deed of distribution to himself, as well as a purchaser from or lender to any other distributee or his transferee. To be protected under this provision, a purchaser or lender need not inquire whether a personal representative acted properly in making the distribution in kind, even if the personal representative and the distributee are the same person, or whether the authority of the personal representative had terminated prior to the distribution. Any recorded instrument described in this section shall be prima facie evidence that such transfer was made for value.

§ 15-3-911. Partition for purpose of distribution.

When two (2) or more heirs or devisees are entitled to distribution of undivided interests in any real or personal property of the estate, the personal representative or one (1) or more of the heirs or devisees may petition the court prior to the formal or informal closing of the estate, to make partition. After notice to the interested heirs or devisees, the court shall partition the property in the same manner as provided by the law for civil actions of partition. The court may direct the personal representative to sell any property which cannot be partitioned without prejudice to the owners and which cannot conveniently be allotted to any one party.

§ 15-3-912. Private agreements among successors to decedent binding on personal representative.

Subject to the rights of creditors and taxing authorities, competent successors may agree among themselves to alter the interests, shares, or amounts to which they are entitled under the will of the decedent, or under the laws of intestacy, in any way that they provide in a written contract executed by all who are affected by its provisions. The personal representative shall abide by the terms of the agreement subject to his obligation to administer the estate for the benefit of creditors, to pay all taxes and costs of administration, and to carry out the responsibilities of his office for the benefit of any successors of the decedent who are not parties. Personal representatives of decedent’s [decedents’] estates are not required to see to the performance of trusts if the trustee thereof is another person who is willing to accept the trust. Accordingly, trustees of a testamentary trust are successors for the purposes of this section. Nothing herein relieves trustees of any duties owed to beneficiaries of trusts.

§ 15-3-913. Distributions to trustee.

Before distributing to a trustee, the personal representative may require that the trust be registered if the state in which it is to be administered provides for registration and that the trustee inform the beneficiaries as provided in section 15-7-303[, Idaho Code,] of this code.

If the trust instrument does not excuse the trustee from giving bond, the personal representative may petition the appropriate court to require that the trustee post bond if he apprehends that distribution might jeopardize the interests of persons who are not able to protect themselves, and he may withhold distribution until the court has acted.

No inference of negligence on the part of the personal representative shall be drawn from his failure to exercise the authority conferred by subsections (a) and (b) of this section.

§ 15-3-914. Disposition of unclaimed assets.

If an heir, devisee or claimant cannot be found, the personal representative shall distribute the share of the missing person to his trustee if one has been appointed or, if no trustee has been appointed, shall file the report of abandoned property required by section 14-517, Idaho Code, and deliver the property in the manner set forth in section 14-519, Idaho Code.

§ 15-3-915. Distribution to person under disability.

A personal representative may discharge his obligation to distribute to any person under legal disability by distributing to his conservator, or any other person authorized by this code or otherwise to give a valid receipt and discharge for the distribution.

§ 15-3-916. Apportionment of estate taxes. [Repealed.]